Washington statutes.
RCW 43.01.041

Accrued vacation leave—Payment upon termination of employment.

Officers and employees referred to in RCW 43.01.040 whose employment is terminated by their death, reduction in force, resignation, dismissal, or retirement, who have been employed for at least six continuous months, and who have accrued vacation leave as specified in RCW 43.01.040 or 43.01.044, shall be paid therefor under their contract of employment, or their estate if they are deceased, or if the employee in case of voluntary resignation has provided adequate notice of termination. Vacation leave accumulated under RCW 43.01.044 is not to be included in the computation of retirement benefits. From July 1, 2011, through June 29, 2013, the amount of pay received by an employee under the provisions of this section shall not be reduced by any temporary salary reduction.

Should the legislature revoke any benefits or rights provided under chapter 292, Laws of 1985, no affected officer or employee shall be entitled thereafter to receive such benefits or exercise such rights as a matter of contractual right.

[ 2017 c 167 s 3; 2011 1st sp.s. c 39 s 13; 1985 c 292 s 1; 1984 c 184 s 20; 1982 1st ex.s. c 51 s 3; 1965 c 8 s 43.01.041. Prior: 1955 c 140 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2017 c 167: See note following RCW 43.01.040.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 39: See note following RCW 41.04.820.

Severability—1984 c 184: See note following RCW 41.50.150.

Savings—Effective date—Severability—1982 1st ex.s. c 51: See notes following RCW 43.01.040.